Utah statutes.
35A-8-1502.   Contesting a customer's eligibility -- Department to determine case.

When a utility contests the eligibility of any residential customer to participate in the program, the executive director or the executive director's designee shall act as an administrative law judge to make a determination on the case.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 212, 2012 General Session

